Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-155
Violations; general penalty.

Unless a more specific criminal penalty is provided, any person who knowingly and willfully violates Chapter 75 or 86, any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any term or condition of any permit or certificate issued by the commission is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of such violation constitutes a separate offense.

Laws 1965, c. 446, § 2, p. 1416;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 200;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 66;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 492.